hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Kampiranje i planinarenje > Prijenosni filtri i pročistači vode: Gravitacijski filtri za vodu; Prijenosni ulošci filtra za vodu; UV pročišćivači vode; Boce s filtrom za vodu; Pumpe za filtriranje vode; Slamke s filtrom za vodu; Kapi za pročišćavanje vode; Tablete za pročišćavanje vode
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 野营与远足 > 便携式滤水器/净化器: 重力净水器; 便携式净水器滤芯; 紫外线净水器; 过滤水瓶; 滤水泵; 净水吸管; 净水滴剂; 净水片
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > キャンプ ・ハイキング > 携帯用浄水器: 重力式浄水器; ポータブル浄水器用カートリッジ; 紫外線浄水器; 浄水ボトル; 浄水機ポンプ; 浄水ストロー; 浄水ドロップ; 浄水器タブレット
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Camping og vandreture > Transportable vandfiltre og vandrensere: Tyngdekraftbaserede vandfiltre; Filterpatroner til bærbare vandfiltre; UV-vandrensere; Vandflasker med filter; Vandfilterpumper; Vandrensende sugerør; Vandrensningsdråber; Vandrensetabletter
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Camping & Wandern > Tragbare Wasserfilter & Wasserreiniger: Schwerkraft-Wasserfilter; Tragbare Wasserfilterkartuschen; UV-Wasseraufbereiter; Wasserfilterflaschen; Wasserfilterpumpen; Wasserfilter-Trinkhalme; Wasseraufbereitungstropfen; Wasseraufbereitungstabletten
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Campismo e caminhada > Purificadores e filtros de água portáteis: Filtros de água por gravidade; Cartuchos de filtro de água portáteis; Purificadores de água UV; Garrafas com filtro de água; Bombas de filtro de água; Palhinhas de filtragem de água; Gotas purificadoras de água; Pastilhas purificadoras de água
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Retkeily ja vaellus > Kannettavat vesisuodattimet ja puhdistuslaitteet: Painovoimaiset vedensuodattimet; Kannettavien vedensuodattimien vaihtopatruunat; UV-vedenpuhdistimet; Vedenpuhdistuspullot; Vesisuodatinpumput; Vedenpuhdistuspillit; Vedenpuhdistustipat; Vedenpuhdistustabletit
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 露營和健行 > 可攜式濾水器/淨水器: 重力濾水器; 攜帶式濾水器濾芯; 紫外線淨水器; 濾水瓶; 水過濾幫浦; 濾水吸管; 淨水滴劑; 淨水片
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Acampamento e caminhada > Filtros e purificadores de água portáteis: Filtros de água por gravidade; Cartuchos para filtros de água portáteis; Purificadores de água UV; Garrafas com filtro de água; Bombas para filtragem de água; Canudos filtradores de água; Gotas purificadoras de água; Comprimidos purificadores de água
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Cắm trại & Đi bộ đường dài > Dụng cụ lọc nước du lịch: Bộ lọc nước trọng lực; Lõi lọc nước di động; Máy lọc nước tia UV; Bình lọc nước; Máy bơm lọc nước; Ống hút lọc nước; Dung dịch lọc nước; Viên lọc nước
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Camping et randonnée > Filtres portables et épurateurs d'eau: Filtres à eau par gravité; Cartouches pour filtres à eau portables; Purificateurs d’eau UV; Gourdes filtrantes; Pompes à filtre à eau; Pailles filtrantes; Gouttes purificatrices d’eau; Comprimés purificateurs d'eau
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Kemping és túrázás > Hordozható vízszűrők és -tisztítók: Gravitációs vízszűrők; Hordozható vízszűrő betétek; UV víztisztítók; Vízszűrős kulacsok; Vízszűrő szivattyúk; Vízszűrő szívószálak; Víztisztító cseppek; Víztisztító tabletták
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Kampiranje in pohodništvo > Prenosni filtri in čistilci vode: Gravitacijski vodni filtri; Kartuše za prenosne filtre za vodo; UV-čistilniki vode; Steklenice z vodnim filtrom; Črpalke za vodni filter; Slamice z vodnim filtrom; Tekočina za čiščenje vode; Tablete za čistilec vode
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Stovyklavimas ir žygiai > Nešiojamieji vandens filtrai ir valytuvai: Gravitaciniai vandens filtrai; Nešiojamų vandens filtrų kasetės; UV vandens valytuvai; Vandens filtravimo buteliai; Vandens filtrų siurbliai; Vandens filtravimo šiaudeliai; Vandens valymo lašai; Vandens valymo tabletės
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Camping y senderismo > Purificadores y filtros de agua portátiles: Filtros de agua por gravedad; Cartuchos para filtros de agua portátiles; Purificadores de agua UV; Botellas con filtro de agua; Bombas de filtro de agua; Filtros de agua de pajilla; Gotas purificadoras de agua; Pastillas potabilizadoras
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Camping & Hiking > Portable Water Filters & Purifiers: Gravity Water Filters; Portable Water Filter Cartridges; UV Water Purifiers; Water Filter Bottles; Water Filter Pumps; Water Filter Straws; Water Purifier Drops; Water Purifier Tablets
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Camping i chodzenie po górach > Przenośne filtry i oczyszczacze do wody: Grawitacyjne filtry do wody; Wkłady do przenośnych filtrów do wody; Oczyszczacze wody UV; Butelki filtrujące; Pompy filtrujące wodę; Słomki filtrujące do wody; Krople do uzdatniania wody; Tabletki do oczyszczania wody
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Camping, vandring och backpacking > Portabla vattenfilter och vattenrenare: Gravitationsvattenfilter; Bärbara vattenfilterpatroner; UV-vattenrenare; Vattenfilterflaskor; Vattenfilterpumpar; Vattenfilterrör; Vattenreningsdroppar; Vattenreningstabletter
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Къмпинг и туризъм > Преносими филтри и пречистватели за вода: Гравитационни водни филтри; Преносими филтърни касети за вода; UV пречистватели за вода; Бутилки с филтър за вода; Филтърни помпи за вода; Сламки с филтър за вода; Капки за пречистване на вода; Таблетки за пречистване на вода
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 캠핑/하이킹 > 휴대용 정수 필터/정수기: 중력식 정수 필터; 휴대용 정수 필터 카트리지; UV 정수기; 정수 필터 물병; 정수 필터 펌프; 정수 빨대; 정수용 드롭; 정수기용 정제
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Kamperen en wandelen > Draadbare waterfilters en zuiveringstoestellen: Zwaartekrachtwaterfilters; Draagbare waterfilterpatronen; UV-waterzuiveraars; Waterfilterflessen; Waterfilterpompen; Waterfilterrietjes; Waterzuiveringsdruppels; Zuiveringstoesteltabletten
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > การตั้งแคมป์และเดินเขา > เครื่องกรองน้ำและเครื่องทำน้ำให้บริสุทธิ์แบบพกพา: เครื่องกรองน้ำระบบแรงโน้มถ่วง; ไส้กรองน้ำพกพา; เครื่องกรองน้ำ UV; ขวดกรองน้ำ; ปั๊มเครื่องกรองน้ำ; หลอดกรองน้ำ; น้ำยาหยดฆ่าเชื้อในน้ำ; เม็ดละลายเพื่อทำให้น้ำบริสุทธิ์
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Campeggio e trekking > Filtri e purificatori portatili acqua: Filtri d'acqua a gravità; Cartucce filtranti per l'acqua portatili; Purificatori d'acqua UV; Borracce con filtro per l'acqua; Pompe per filtro dell'acqua; Cannucce filtranti per l'acqua; Gocce purificanti per l'acqua; Compresse per depuratore d'acqua
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Kempovanie a turistika > Prenosné vodné filtre a čističky: Gravitačné vodné filtre; Prenosné filtračné kazety na vodu; UV čističky vody; Fľaše pre vodné filtre; Vodné filtračné pumpy; Slamky pre vodné filtre; Kvapky na čistenie vody; Tablety na čistenie vody
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Кемпинги и походы > Портативные фильтры и таблетки для очистки воды: Гравитационные фильтры для воды; Картриджи для портативных фильтров для воды; Ультрафиолетовые очистители воды; Бутылки с фильтром для воды; Фильтры-насосы; Фильтры-соломинки для воды; Капли для очистки воды; Таблетки для очистки воды
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kampçılık ve Doğa Yürüyüşü > Portatif Su Filtreleri ve Arıtıcılar: Yer çekimli su filtreleri; Taşınabilir su filtresi kartuşları; UV su arıtıcıları; Su filtreli şişeler; Su Filtresi Pompaları; Su filtresi pipetleri; Su arıtma damlaları; Su Arıtma Tabletleri
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Camping og fjellvandring > Portable vannfiltre og purifikatorer: Vannfilter med tyngdekraft; Bærbare patroner til vannfilter; UV-vannrensere; Flasker med vannfilter; Vannfilterpumper; Sugerør med vannfilter; Vannrensende dråper; Vannrensetabletter
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Κατασκήνωση & πεζοπορία > Φορητά φίλτρα & καθαριστές νερού: Φίλτρα νερού βαρύτητας; Ανταλλακτικά φορητών φίλτρων νερού; Συσκευές καθαρισμού νερού με UV; Παγούρια με φίλτρο νερού; Αντλίες φίλτρου νερού; Καλαμάκια φιλτραρίσματος νερού; Σταγόνες καθαρισμού νερού; Ταμπλέτες καθαρισμού νερού
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Kempování a turistika > Přenosné vodní filtry a čističky: Gravitační filtry na vodu; Kartuše do přenosných vodních filtrů; UV čističky vody; Filtrační láhve na vodu; Čerpadla s vodním filtrem; Filtrační brčka na vodu; Kapky na čištění vody; Tablety pro čištění vody
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Camping și drumeții > Filtre și purificatoare de apă portabile: Filtre de apă gravitaționale; Cartușe pentru filtre de apă portabile; Purificatoare de apă cu UV; Sticle cu filtru de apă; Pompe cu filtru pentru apă; Paie cu filtru de apă; Picături pentru purificarea apei; Tablete pentru purificarea apei